Mississippi statutes. Title 21. Municipalities
Chapter 9. Council-Manager Plan of Government
§ 21-9-65.
Petitions for special election.

Except as otherwise provided for, no special election shall be held, and no ordinance, in which any petition or protest is required, shall be referred to, or voted on, at any election unless, within the time allowed by the terms hereof, a sufficient petition or petitions, addressed to the mayor, demanding such election or protesting against or requesting the adoption of such ordinances, shall be personally signed by at least twenty-five per centum of all the qualified electors of such city and filed with the city clerk. Immediately upon the filing of any such petition or petitions with the city clerk, he shall endorse thereon the date of such filing and shall within ten days thereafter, verify the signatures thereto by the registration and poll books, and deliver such petition or petitions to the mayor of such city, together with the certificate of such clerk showing the total number of qualified electors of such city and also the total number of qualified electors who shall have signed such petition or petitions, which certificate shall be prima facie correct but not conclusive. If it shall appear from said petition or petitions and the certificate of such clerk that the same are in proper form and have been signed by the required number of the qualified electors of such city, it shall be the duty of the council at its next regular meeting to order such special election, or refer such ordinance to a vote of the electors of such city, in case of their failure to wholly repeal the same. Each and every petition shall, at the time the same is filed with the city clerk, have attached thereto the affidavit of one or more of the signers thereto, stating the total number of names signed to such petition at the time of filing the same, and no such petition shall be received or filed by the city clerk unless such affidavit is attached thereto.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 3825.5-33; Laws, 1948, ch. 385, § 33.

§ 21-9-67.
Ordering by council of special elections.

Whenever any ordinance or resolution adopted by the council, or any other matter, is required to be referred to a vote of the qualified electors of any city, the council shall order a special election for the determination of the matter, to be held no less than thirty days nor more than sixty days from the making of such order, provided that there shall not be a general election to be held in such city within sixty days from the date of the order referring such matter to the judgment of the electors. In case there is to be such a general election, the matter shall be referred to and voted upon at such general election. All such special elections shall be held and conducted as other elections in such city.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 3825.5-41; Laws, 1948, ch. 385, § 41.

§ 21-9-69.
Conduct of elections.

Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, all elections of every kind, special or otherwise, shall be conducted in any city operating under the council-manager form of government in the same manner and method and under the same laws and regulations as the same would have been conducted if the council-manager plan of government had not been adopted.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 3825.5-47; Laws, 1948, ch. 385, § 47.

§ 21-9-71.
Election offenses.

Any officer or employee other than the mayor and councilmen of any such city, who shall solicit or attempt to influence any person to vote for any particular candidate at any election held in such city, or who shall in any manner contribute any money, labor or other valuable thing to any person or organization for election purposes, shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and upon conviction shall be punished by a fine not exceeding One Hundred Dollars ($100.00), or by imprisonment in the county jail not exceeding thirty days, or by both such fine and imprisonment.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 3825.5-37; Laws, 1948, ch. 385, § 37.

§ 21-9-73.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 1983, ch. 469, § 10, eff from and after July 1, 1983.

[Codes, 1942, § 3825.5-36; Laws, 1948, ch. 385, § 36]

§ 21-9-75.
Police court and public schools unaffected by reorganization.

This chapter shall not in any manner, irrespective of other provisions hereof, affect the organization of the police court or of the public schools, which shall continue to operate by and under the laws otherwise applicable.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 3825.5-27; Laws, 1948, ch. 385, § 27; Laws, 1952, ch. 372, § 14.

§ 21-9-77.
Existing laws, rights and liabilities of city unaffected by reorganization.

All laws governing cities heretofore operating under another form of government, which are not inconsistent with the provisions of this chapter respecting the council-manager plan of government, shall apply to and govern such cities respectively when they shall come under the said council-manager plan. All by-laws, ordinances and resolutions lawfully passed and in force in every such city under its former organization shall remain in force until altered or repealed by the council elected under the provisions of this chapter.

The territorial limits of every such city shall remain the same as under its former organization. All rights and property of every description, which were vested in every such city under its former organization, shall vest in the same under the organization contemplated by the council-manager plan of government. No right or liability, either in favor of or against such city, and no suit or prosecution of any kind shall be affected by such change, unless otherwise provided.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 3825.5-26; Laws, 1948, ch. 385, § 26.

§ 21-9-79.
Application of civil service laws.

All of the provisions of the civil service laws applying to any city adopting the council-manager plan of government, at the time of such adoption shall continue to apply in full force and effect to such city after adoption of such council-manager plan of government. The civil service commission existing and operating under the former plan of government shall continue to operate without interruption or impairment under the council-manager form of government. All rights, privileges, and advantages of all employees coming under the civil service laws, applying to said city at the time of adoption shall remain in full force and effect and shall in no wise be impaired, altered or changed by such adoption. After the election and taking of office of the councilmen and mayor under the council-manager plan of government, all functions and duties of every nature that would have otherwise been performed by the council under the commission form of government in relation to such civil service laws shall thereafter be exercised and performed by the city council under the council-manager plan of government, except that all appointments of employees coming under the provisions of such civil service laws shall be made, subject to such civil service laws, by the city manager, but all appointments made prior to the change to the council-manager plan shall remain in full force and effect.

The city manager is expressly excluded from coming under the terms and provisions of the civil service laws herein mentioned and is expressly excluded from the employees therein included.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 3825.5-44; Laws, 1948, ch. 385, § 44.

§ 21-9-81.
Provisions as to disability and relief fund for firemen and policemen to continue unaffected.

All of the provisions of Sections 21-25-5, 21-25-7, and 21-29-101 through 21-29-151, shall be applicable to any city operating under the council-manager plan as herein provided, and all rights of every policeman and fireman of any such city under the disability and relief fund for firemen and policemen shall be unimpaired, and there shall be no interruption or change in the operation or administration of the disability and relief fund for firemen and policemen, and other city employees.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 3825.5-45; Laws, 1948, ch. 385, § 45.

§ 21-9-83.
General and special laws and statutes to be construed as applicable to council.

Wherever, in any general or special law or statute, any power is conferred or duty enjoined or penalty imposed upon any officer, commission, board, or other body, acting for a city, such law or statute shall be held to confer such power and to enjoin such duty and impose such penalty upon the council, and the members thereof, in cities operating under a council-manager form of government. Whenever in this chapter or in any statute of this state, the word “franchise” is used it shall, when applied to cities operating under council-manager form of government, include every special privilege in the streets, highways, and public places of the city, whether granted by the state or the city, which does not belong to the citizens generally by common right.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 3825.5-40; Laws, 1948, ch. 385, § 40.